Oklahoma, session 2026, SB1593.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 70 O.S. 2021, Section 4663, as
amended by Section 1, Chapter 230, O.S.L. 2024 (70 O.S. Supp. 2025,
Section 4663), is amended to read as follows:
Section 4663. A. On January 1, 1999, there shall be created
the Board of Trustees for Oklahoma State University/Tulsa which
shall consist of seven members who reside in Tulsa County or
contiguous counties, one member of the Board of Regents for the
Oklahoma Agricultural and Mechanical Colleges (A&M Board) who shall
reside in the First Congressional District, and one member who shall
be appointed by the chair of the A&M Board. The member of the A&M
Board and the member appointed by the chair of the A&M Board shall
serve as voting, ex officio members. For purposes of serving on the
Board of Trustees, the member of the A&M Board and the member

appointed by the chair of the A&M Board who are appointed to the
Board of Trustees shall not be subject to the dual office holding
restrictions in Section 6 of Title 51 of the Oklahoma Statutes. The
Governor shall appoint the other members of the Board of Trustees
with the advice and consent of the Senate. The members shall be
appointed to numbered positions with staggered terms to expire as
provided in this section. Successors to the initial board members
shall serve seven-year terms that shall expire on June 30 of the
seventh year following appointment. Vacancies on the Board shall be
filled for the unexpired term by the Governor with the advice and
consent of the Senate. The member of the A&M Board who resides in
the First Congressional District shall hold position number eight.
The member appointed by the chair of the A&M Board shall hold
position number nine. The numbered positions and terms shall be as
follows:
1. Position No. 1: The term of office of one member shall
expire on the 30th day of June, 2000, and each seven (7) years
thereafter;
2. Position No. 2: The term of office of one member shall
expire on the 30th day of June, 2001, and each seven (7) years
thereafter;
3. Position No. 3: The term of office of one member shall
expire on the 30th day of June, 2002, and each seven (7) years
thereafter;
4. Position No. 4: The term of office of one member shall
expire on the 30th day of June, 2003, and each seven (7) years
thereafter;
5. Position No. 5: The term of office of one member shall
expire on the 30th day of June, 2004, and each seven (7) years
thereafter;
6. Position No. 6: The term of office of one member shall
expire on the 30th day of June, 2005, and each seven (7) years
thereafter;
ENR. S. B. NO. 1593 Page 2

7. Position No. 7: The term of office of one member shall
expire on the 30th day of June, 2006, and each seven (7) years
thereafter;
8. Position No. 8: The term of office shall coincide with the
member’s term on the A&M Board; and
9. Position No. 9: The term of office shall be at the
direction of the chair of the A&M Board.
B. The Board of Trustees shall be a body corporate and shall
adopt and use an official seal. The Board shall elect a chair, vice
chair, and secretary annually, each of whom shall serve for a term
of one fiscal year and until a successor is elected and qualified,
and who shall perform such duties as the Board directs. The Board
shall adopt rules which it deems necessary for the operation of the
Board and the discharge of its duties and shall cause the minutes of
all meetings to be kept. The Board shall comply with the Oklahoma
Open Meeting Act and the Oklahoma Open Records Act.
C. The Board of Trustees for Oklahoma State University/Tulsa
may be authorized by the A&M Board to supervise and manage the
campus of Oklahoma State University/Tulsa and perform other
functions as necessary. The Board of Trustees shall promulgate
rules and enact policies to govern the processes and procedures of
the Board. It is the intent of the Legislature that in the
interests of immediate responsiveness to the needs of students,
employees, and the business community that the decision or approval
process be expedited.
D. On or after January 1, 1999, the A&M Board may assign and
delineate roles and responsibilities for the Board of Trustees for
Oklahoma State University/Tulsa. Such responsibilities may include,
but are not limited to, student services, facility operations,
student financial services, budget preparations, endowed chairs at
Oklahoma State University/Tulsa, and administrative operations as
specified by the A&M Board.
E. The Board of Trustees shall establish the usual and
customary accounts established by higher education institutions
within the Office of Management and Enterprise Services necessary to
carry out its duties.
ENR. S. B. NO. 1593 Page 3

F. Until July 1, 2001, during the transition and development of
Oklahoma State University/Tulsa, acting on behalf of the Board of
Trustees for Oklahoma State University/Tulsa, Oklahoma State
University is authorized and directed to negotiate contracts with
institutions for courses and degree programs of study approved by
the Oklahoma State Regents for Higher Education, as necessary to
meet the higher education needs for the Tulsa metropolitan area.
The number of degree programs offered by Northeastern State
University and Langston University shall not be diminished or
duplicated.
G. The president of Oklahoma State University/Tulsa shall be
selected by the Board of Regents for the Oklahoma Agricultural and
Mechanical Colleges after completion of a search process as set
forth in this subsection. The A&M Board shall appoint at least two
of its members, one of whom must reside in the First Congressional
District, and the Board of Trustees shall appoint at least two of
its members to a search committee. The president of Oklahoma State
University may appoint other representatives of faculty, staff, and
students to the search committee. The president of Oklahoma State
University shall recommend a candidate in consultation with the
search committee to the Board of Trustees and the A&M Board.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective July 1, 2026.
SECTION 3. It being immediately necessary for the preservation
of the public peace, health, or safety, an emergency is hereby
declared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and
be in full force from and after its passage and approval.
ENR. S. B. NO. 1593 Page 4

Passed the Senate the 11th day of March, 2026.
Presiding Officer of the Senate
Passed the House of Representatives the 6th day of May, 2026.
Presiding Officer of the House
of Representatives
OFFICE OF THE GOVERNOR
Received by the Office of the Governor this ____________________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
Approved by the Governor of the State of Oklahoma this _________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
_________________________________
Governor of the State of Oklahoma
OFFICE OF THE SECRETARY OF STATE
Received by the Office of the Secretary of State this __________
day of __________________, 20 _______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
ENR. S. B. NO. 1593 Page 5